Utah statutes.
23-23-6.   Season dates -- Boundaries -- Review by councils and board.

(1)  The Wildlife Board shall establish season dates and boundaries for each cooperative wildlife management unit.

(2)  Season dates may differ from general statewide season dates.

(3)  At least every five years, cooperative wildlife management units containing public land will be reviewed by the regional advisory councils and the Wildlife Board.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 258, 1997 General Session

